Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.038

Publication, sale, and distribution of code and supplements—Reprints.

The statute law committee shall publish, sell and distribute, and arrange for the publication, sale and distribution of the Revised Code of Washington and of supplements thereto and of such other materials as in their discretion may be incorporated in or appended to the code. They may republish, reprint or authorize the republishing or reprinting of the code or any portion thereof.

[ 1955 c 235 s 7; 1953 c 257 s 11.]